California, session 20252026, AB93.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature that data centers are considered commercial, industrial, and institutional users under the state’s “Making Conservation a California Way of Life” regulation (Article 1 (commencing with Section 965) of Chapter 3.5 of Division 3 of Title 23 of the California Code of Regulations), consistent with the urban water use objectives under Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 10609) of Part 2.55 of Division 6 of the Water Code.(b) The Legislature finds and declares that the growth of data center operations has created increasing demand for water and energy resources, which may have implications for statewide sustainability goals. The Department of Water Resources possesses the technical expertise, planning capacity, and regulatory experience necessary to evaluate and develop efficiency standards that balance operational reliability with resource conservation.(c) It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage the department to examine, in consultation with relevant stakeholders, potential efficiency measures for data centers that align with California’s environmental, economic, and infrastructure objectives. The Legislature further finds that such exploration should include consideration of water use efficiency, energy demand management, and the integration of emerging technologies, while respecting the operational requirements and economic realities of the sector.SEC. 2. Section 16000.4 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:16000.4. (a) For purposes of this section, “data center” means a room, or portion of a room, in a building used primarily to house information technology equipment that serves a total information technology equipment load greater than 10 kilowatts and 20 watts per square foot of conditioned floor area.(b) For purposes of this section, “water supplier” means either of the following:(1) “Urban water supplier,” as defined by Section 10617 of the Water Code.(2) “Community water system,” as defined by Section 116275 of the Health and Safety Code.(c) (1) Prior to applying to a city for an initial business license, equivalent instrument, or permit, a person who owns or operates a data center shall provide its water supplier, under penalty of perjury, an estimate of the expected water use.(2) When applying to a city for an initial business license, equivalent instrument, or permit, a person who owns or operates a data center shall self-certify, under penalty of perjury, on the application, that they have provided its water supplier an estimate of the expected water use. (3) When applying to a city for a renewal of a business license, equivalent instrument, or permit, a person who owns or operates a data center shall self-certify, under penalty of perjury, on the renewal application, that they have provided the data center’s water supplier with a report of annual water use.SEC. 3. Section 16100.4 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:16100.4. (a) For purposes of this section, “data center” means a room, or portion of a room, in a building used primarily to house information technology equipment that serves a total information technology equipment load greater than 10 kilowatts and 20 watts per square foot of conditioned floor area.(b) For purposes of this section, “water supplier” means either of the following:(1) “Urban water supplier,” as defined by Section 10617 of the Water Code.(2) “Community water system,” as defined by Section 116275 of the Health and Safety Code.(c) (1) Prior to applying to a county for an initial business license, equivalent instrument, or permit, a person who owns or operates a data center shall provide its water supplier, under penalty of perjury, an estimate of the expected water use.(2) When applying to a county for an initial business license, equivalent instrument, or permit, a person who owns or operates a data center shall self-certify, under penalty of perjury, on the application, that they have provided its water supplier an estimate of the expected water use.(3) When applying to a county for a renewal of a business license, equivalent instrument, or permit, a person who owns or operates a data center shall self-certify, under penalty of perjury, on the renewal application, that they have provided the data center’s water supplier with a report of annual water use.SEC. 4. Section 10609.35 is added to the Water Code, to read:10609.35. As part of adopting any efficiency standard pursuant to this chapter, the department may identify different tiers of data centers, as defined in Sections 16000.4 and 16100.4 of the Business and Professions Code, based on factors affecting water consumption, and appropriate standards for each data center tier.SEC. 5. The Legislature finds and declares that water conservation is a matter of statewide concern and is not a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, Sections 2 and 3 of this act adding Sections 16000.4 and 16100.4 to the Business and Professions Code apply to all cities, including charter cities.SEC. 6. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.